Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8454. MONTGOMERY COUNTY MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT NO. 126

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8454.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Montgomery County Municipal Utility District No. 126.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 932 (H.B. 1586), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8454.101. NO ALLOCATION AGREEMENT. Section 54.016(f), Water Code, does not apply to the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 932 (H.B. 1586), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.